Utah statutes.
72-7-405.   Measuring vehicles for size and weight compliance -- Summary powers of peace officers -- Penalty for violations.

(1)  Any peace officer having reason to believe that the height, width, length, or weight of a vehicle and load is unlawful may require the operator to stop the vehicle and submit to a measurement or weighing of the vehicle and load.

(2)  A peace officer may require that the vehicle be driven to the nearest scales or port-of-entry if the scales or port-of-entry is within three miles.

(3) (a)  A peace officer, special function officer, or port-of-entry agent may measure or weigh a vehicle and vehicle load for compliance with this chapter.

(b)  If, upon measuring or weighing a vehicle and load, it is determined that the height, width, length, or weight is unlawful, the measuring or weighing peace officer, special function officer, or port-of-entry agent may require the operator to park the vehicle in a suitable place.  The vehicle shall remain parked until the vehicle or its load is adjusted or a portion of the load is removed to conform to legal limits.  All materials unloaded shall be cared for by the owner or operator of the vehicle at his risk.

(4) An operator who fails or refuses to stop and submit the vehicle and load to a measurement or weighing, or who fails or refuses when directed by a peace officer, special function officer, or port-of-entry agent to comply with this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

(5)  Any driver or owner of a vehicle who violates Section 72-7-404 or 72-7-406 is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 270, 1998 General Session

